Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.433

Fertilizer database—Public availability—Biennial report to legislature.

(1) The department shall maintain a fertilizer database that includes the information required for registration under RCW 15.54.325 and 15.54.330.

(2) Except for confidential information under RCW 15.54.362 regarding fertilizer tonnages distributed in the state, information in the fertilizer database must be made available to the public upon request.

(3) The department, and the department of ecology in consultation with the department of health, shall biennially prepare a report to the legislature presenting information on levels of nonnutritive substances in fertilizers and the results of any agency testing of products. The first report must be provided to the legislature by December 1, 1999.

(4) The department shall post on the internet the information contained in applications for fertilizer registration.

[ 2008 c 292 s 4; 1998 c 36 s 21.]

NOTES:

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.